Maine, session 132, LD937.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11164 is enacted to read:
§11164. Permit to hunt coyote over bait
1. Permit required. Except as otherwise authorized pursuant to this Part, a person may
not hunt coyote over bait unless that person has a valid permit issued under this section.
Each day a person violates this subsection, that person commits a Class E crime for which
a minimum fine of $50 and an amount equal to twice the applicable license fee must be
imposed.
2. Eligibility; hunting license required. A person who possesses a valid hunting
license is eligible to obtain a permit from the commissioner or the commissioner's
authorized agent to hunt coyote over bait from September 1st to December 15th, as long as
the person complies with the coyote bait placement provisions established in section 11227,
subsection 2-A.
3. Issuance; fee. The commissioner shall issue a permit to hunt coyote over bait to an
eligible person at a fee of $4.
4. Rules. The commissioner may adopt rules necessary for the proper administration
and enforcement of this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §11227, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Placement of bait for hunting coyote. A person who has obtained a permit to
hunt coyote over bait pursuant to section 11164 shall comply with the bait placement
provisions in this section and may place coyote bait only in towns known to have active
deer wintering areas located within wildlife management districts 1 to 14, 18, 19, 27 and
28.
The commissioner shall establish rules to administer the placement of coyote bait pursuant
to this subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as
defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.